Ohio, session 136, HB729.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.932 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.932. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, interstate route number seventy-five, running in a northeasterly and southwesterly direction in Butler county, shall be known as the "Patrolman Earnest E. Cole Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.